Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Unlawful Acts.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs, Narcotics, and Poisons, §§ 69, 76.

28 C.J.S. Supp., Drugs and Narcotics, §§ 42-44.

Sec. 08.80.380.
Issuance of shopkeepers permits. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.80.045.]

Sec. 08.80.390.
Pharmacists required in hospitals and clinics.

A hospital, clinic, nursing home, infirmary, or related facility that provides outpatient dispensing of drugs for outpatient treatment shall have a licensed pharmacist in charge of the dispensary, except that prescriptions may be compounded and dispensed by or under the supervision of the prescribing physician.

The board shall issue a license to a hospital drug room, nursing home drug room, or related facility that dispenses drugs from bulk supply for inpatient treatment, providing the facility employs a licensed pharmacist on a continual or consultant basis.

History.

(§ 12 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 23 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 29 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For institutional pharmacies, see 12 AAC 52, art. 7.

For drug rooms and facilities without a pharmacy, see 12 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), substituted “provides outpatient dispensing of drugs” for “dispenses drugs”.

Sec. 08.80.400.
Other licensees not affected.

This chapter does not affect the practice of medicine by a licensed medical doctor and does not limit a licensed medical doctor, osteopath, podiatrist, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, dentist, veterinarian, dispensing optician, or optometrist in supplying a patient with any medicinal preparation or article within the scope of the person’s license.

History.

(§ 12 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 21 ch 45 SLA 1996; am § 23 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” following “advanced”.

Sec. 08.80.410.
Use of term “pharmacist” prohibited.

A person may not assume or use the title “pharmacist,” or any variation of the title, or hold out to be a pharmacist, without being licensed.

History.

(§ 13(a) ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 22 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for licensed pharmacists, see AS

08.02.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 08.80.420.
Certain advertising prohibited.

A person may not use or exhibit the title “pharmacist,” “assistant pharmacist,” or “druggist,” or the descriptive term “pharmacy,” “drug store,” “drug sundries,” or other similar title or term containing the word “drug,” in any business premises, or in an advertisement through the media of press, or publication, or by radio or television, unless the business has a licensed pharmacist in regular and continuous employment.

[Repealed by § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 13(b) ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 24 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 166 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.80.430.
Use of pharmacy symbols prohibited.

A person may not display in a place of business the characteristic pharmacy symbol of “Rx” in any form unless the business has a pharmacist licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 13(c) ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 25 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.80.440.
Denial of examination or license. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.450.
Disciplinary action.

The board may consider a complaint based upon the alleged violation of any provision of this chapter and may, by a majority vote of a quorum, dismiss the complaint, reprimand a licensee, or take other punitive action as the nature of the facts warrant. Orders issued by the board shall be in writing, signed by a majority and filed with the secretary of the board.
The accused shall receive an authenticated copy of the order.

History.

(§ 17 ch 194 SLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Sec. 08.80.460.
Penalties.

Except for a violation of AS

08.80.297

, a person who violates a provision of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person who violates the provisions of AS

08.80.295

or

08.80.297

may be punished by a civil fine in an amount established by the board in a schedule or schedules establishing the amount of civil fine for a particular violation. The schedule or schedules shall be adopted by the board by regulation. Any civil fine imposed under this section may be appealed in the manner provided for appeals in AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 19 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 26 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 187 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 100 SLA 2018; am § 4 ch 100 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 45, SLA 1989 conditionally amended (b) of this section effective January 1, 1990, “unless by that date the director of the division of occupational licensing has certified to the revisor of statutes that the Board of Pharmacy has adopted regulations establishing the schedule of civil fines required under AS

08.80.460(b)

.” The director did make such certification by that date, so the amendment by § 2, ch. 45, SLA 1989 did not take effect.

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, in (a), added “Except for a violation of AS

08.80.297

,” at the beginning, and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, in the first sentence of (b), added “or

08.80.297

” following “AS

08.80.295

” and replaced “is punishable” with “may be punished”.